Florida, session 2026, HB879.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (5) of section 472.015, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
472.015 Licensure.—
(5)(a) The board shall certify as qualified for a license
by endorsement an applicant who, at the time of application:
1. Holds a valid license to practice surveying and mapping
issued before July 1, 1999, by another state or territory of the
United States; has passed a national, regional, state, or
territorial licensing examination that is substantially
equivalent to the examination required by s. 472.013; and has a
specific experience record of at least 8 years as a subordinate
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb879-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 879 2026
to a registered surveyor and mapper in the active practice of
surveying and mapping, 6 years of which must be of a nature
indicating that the applicant was in responsible charge of the
accuracy and correctness of the surveying and mapping work
performed; or
2. Holds a valid license to practice surveying and mapping
issued by another state or territory of the United States if the
criteria for issuance of the license were substantially the same
as the licensure criteria that existed in Florida at the time
the license was issued; or
3. Holds a valid license to practice surveying and mapping
issued by another state or territory of the United States, is
currently in good standing with such licensing authority, and
has a specific experience record of at least 5 years as a
registered surveyor and mapper in the active practice of
surveying and mapping, which must be of a nature indicating that
the applicant was in responsible charge of the accuracy and
correctness of the surveying and mapping work performed.
(b) All applicants for licensure by endorsement must pass
the Florida law and rules portion of the examination prior to
licensure.
(c) For purposes of determining whether an applicant is in
good standing under subparagraph (a)3., the board may require
documentation, verification, or certification from the issuing
authority, and may independently evaluate disciplinary,
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb879-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 879 2026
regulatory, or competency records maintained by such authority
or other reliable sources. The board may adopt rules to
implement this section in a manner consistent with s. 472.008.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb879-00